Utah statutes.
41-6a-1506.   Motorcycles -- Required equipment -- Brakes.

(1)  A motorcycle and a motor-driven cycle shall be equipped with the following items:

(a)  one head lamp which, when factory equipped with an automatic lighting ignition system, may not be disconnected;

(b)  one tail lamp;

(c)  either a tail lamp or a separate lamp which illuminates the rear license plate with a white light;

(d)  one red reflector on the rear, either separate or as part of the tail lamp;

(e)  one stop lamp;

(f)  a braking system, other than parking brake, in accordance with Section 41-6a-1623;

(g)  a horn or warning device in accordance with Section 41-6a-1625;

(h)  a muffler and emission control system in accordance with Section 41-6a-1626;

(i)  a mirror in accordance with Section 41-6a-1627; and

(j)  tires in accordance with Section 41-6a-1636.

(2)  The department may require an inspection of the braking system on a motor-driven cycle and disapprove a braking system that is not designed or constructed as to insure reasonable and reliable performance in actual use in accordance with Section 41-6a-1623.

(3)  A person may not operate a motor-driven cycle on a highway if the department has disapproved the braking system on the motor-driven cycle.

(4) (a)  Upon notice to the party to whom the motor-driven cycle is registered, the department may suspend the registration of a motor-driven cycle if the department has disapproved the braking system under this section.

(b)  The Motor Vehicle Division shall, under Subsection 41-1a-109(1)(e) or (2), refuse to register a motor-driven cycle if it has reason to believe the motor-driven cycle has a braking system disapproved under this section.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

